Nevada, session 83, AB123.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 293 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. A person shall not directly or indirectly address
any threat or intimidation to a candidate for public office if the
person:
(a) Knows or has reason to know that the threat or
intimidation communicates the intent, either immediately or in the
future, to cause or induce another to cause:
(1) Bodily injury to the candidate or another who the
person knows or has reason to know is a family member of the
candidate; or
(2) Physical damage to the property of the candidate or
another who the person knows or has reason to know is a family
member of the candidate; and
(b) Addresses the threat or intimidation in a manner which
places the person who receives the threat or intimidation in
reasonable fear that the threat or intimidation will be carried out.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as to prohibit a
person from engaging in any constitutionally protected exercise of
free speech, including political hyperbole.
3. A person who violates the provisions of subsection 1:
(a) For the first offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(b) For the second or any subsequent offense, is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor.
Sec. 3. 1. A candidate who believes that he or she is the
subject of a threat or intimidation addressed in violation of the
provisions of section 2 of this act may notify the Secretary of State
in writing of the alleged violation.
2. Upon receipt of a notice of an alleged violation pursuant to
subsection 1, the Secretary of State shall conduct an investigation
and if the Secretary of State determines that reasonable suspicion
exists that a violation of section 2 of this act has occurred, the
Secretary of State shall, as soon as practicable, refer the matter to
the Attorney General for a determination of whether to institute
proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce the
provisions of section 2 of this act.
3. After the conclusion of the investigation conducted
pursuant to subsection 2, the Secretary of State shall issue to the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
candidate who notified the Secretary of State of the threat or
intimidation a written report that includes:
(a) A description of the alleged violation;
(b) The results of the investigation undertaken by the
Secretary of State; and
(c) If applicable, the outcome of the referral of the matter to
the Attorney General.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)